Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB251.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 2005-I. Reporting of partnerships with foreign nations.(a) Duty to report.--A public institution of higher education that intends to make an expenditure involving the travel of a student or staff person to a foreign nation for an academic, cultural or research activity or purpose shall submit a report to the department one calendar year before the travel.(b) Contents of report.--A report under subsection (a) shall include the cost, duration, rubric, source of funds, the purpose 1234567891011121314151617181920 and the benefit derived for this Commonwealth.(c) Posting of reports.--The department shall post on its publicly accessible Internet website a report received under this section and shall maintain the posting for a period of not less than five years from the date the report is received.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Public institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A.(2) A rural regional college established under Article XIX-G.(3) A university within the State System of Higher Education under Article XX-A.(4) A State-related institution as defined in section 2001-C.(5) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.(6) The Pennsylvania College of Technology.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0251PN0200 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122